South Carolina, session 2025-2026, S351.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.   The regulations of the Department of Labor, Licensing and Regulation - Board of Examiners for Licensure of Professional Counselors, Marriage and Family Therapists, Addiction Counselors and Psycho-Educational Specialists, relating to Licensing Provisions for Professional Counselor Associate and Marriage and Family Therapy Associates, designated as Regulation Document Number 5354, and submitted to the General Assembly pursuant to the provisions of Article 1, Chapter 23, Title 1 of the S.C. Code, are approved. SECTION 2.   This joint resolution takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XXX---- SUMMARY AS SUBMITTED BY PROMULGATING AGENCY. The Board of Examiners for Licensure of Professional Counselors, Marriage and Family Therapists, Addiction Counselors and Psycho-Educational Specialists proposes to amend R.36-04 and R.36-07 regarding educational requirements for Licensed Professional Counselor associates and Marriage and Family Therapist associates, and to amend continuing education requirements for licensees of the Board to conform to Act 158 of the 2024 legislative session. A Notice of Drafting was published in the State Register on June 28, 2024. ----XX----